Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.aff
SFX K Y 410
SFX K   r    ñésemos      vir
SFX K   r    ñésedes      vir
SFX K   r    ñéramos      vir
SFX K   r    ñérades      vir
SFX K   r    ño           ter
SFX K   r    ño           or
SFX K   r    ñestes       vir
SFX K   r    ñeses        vir
SFX K   r    ñesen        vir
SFX K   r    ñese         vir
SFX K   r    ñeron        vir
SFX K   r    ñermos       vir
SFX K   r    ñeres        vir
SFX K   r    ñeren        vir
SFX K   r    ñerdes       vir
SFX K   r    ñeras        vir
SFX K   r    ñeran        vir
SFX K   r    ñera         vir
SFX K   r    ñer          vir
SFX K   r    ñen          ter
SFX K   r    ñen          or
SFX K   r    ñemos        vir
SFX K   r    ñeche        vir
SFX K   r    ñas          vir
SFX K   r    ñas          ter
SFX K   r    ñas          or
SFX K   r    ñan          vir
SFX K   r    ñan          ter
SFX K   r    ñan          or
SFX K   r    ñamos        ter
SFX K   r    ñamos        or
SFX K   r    ñades        ter
SFX K   r    ñades        or
SFX K   r    ña           vir
SFX K   r    ña           ter
SFX K   r    ña           or
SFX K   r    xo           ver
SFX K   r    xas          ver
SFX K   r    xan          ver
SFX K   r    xamos        ver
SFX K   r    xades        ver
SFX K   r    xa           ver
SFX K   r    stos         or
SFX K   r    sto          or
SFX K   r    stas         or
SFX K   r    sta          or
SFX K   r    s            rir
SFX K   r    o            rir
SFX K   r    ndo          vir
SFX K   r    ndo          ver
SFX K   r    ndo          ter
SFX K   r    ndo          pracer
SFX K   r    ndo          or
SFX K   r    ndo          facer
SFX K   r    ndo          dicer
SFX K   r    ndes         vir
SFX K   r    ndes         ter
SFX K   r    ndes         or
SFX K   r    nde          vir
SFX K   r    nde          ter
SFX K   r    nde          or
SFX K   r    n            vir
SFX K   r    mos          vir
SFX K   r    mos          ver
SFX K   r    mos          ter
SFX K   r    mos          rir
SFX K   r    mos          or
SFX K   r    mos          gredir
SFX K   r    mos          facer
SFX K   r    mos          dicer
SFX K   r    i            pracer
SFX K   r    i            facer
SFX K   r    i            dicer
SFX K   r    en           rir
SFX K   r    dos          vir
SFX K   r    do           vir
SFX K   r    des          ver
SFX K   r    des          rir
SFX K   r    des          gredir
SFX K   r    des          facer
SFX K   r    des          dicer
SFX K   r    de           ver
SFX K   r    das          vir
SFX K   r    da           vir
SFX K   r    amos         rir
SFX K   r    ades         rir
SFX K   or   úñamos       or
SFX K   or   úñades       or
SFX K   or   ós           or
SFX K   or   ó            or
SFX K   or   uñas         or
SFX K   or   uñan         or
SFX K   or   uña          or
SFX K   or   uxésemos     or
SFX K   or   uxésedes     or
SFX K   or   uxéramos     or
SFX K   or   uxérades     or
SFX K   or   uxo          or
SFX K   or   uxestes      or
SFX K   or   uxeses       or
SFX K   or   uxesen       or
SFX K   or   uxese        or
SFX K   or   uxeron       or
SFX K   or   uxermos      or
SFX K   or   uxeres       or
SFX K   or   uxeren       or
SFX K   or   uxerdes      or
SFX K   or   uxeras       or
SFX K   or   uxeran       or
SFX K   or   uxera        or
SFX K   or   uxer         or
SFX K   or   uxen         or
SFX K   or   uxemos       or
SFX K   or   uxeche       or
SFX K   ir   íñamos       vir
SFX K   ir   íñades       vir
SFX K   ir   eño          vir
SFX K   ir   eñen         vir
SFX K   ir   eñas         vir
SFX K   ir   eñan         vir
SFX K   ir   eñamos       vir
SFX K   ir   eñades       vir
SFX K   ir   eña          vir
SFX K   ir   eu           vir
SFX K   icer i            dicer
SFX K   er   íñamos       ter
SFX K   er   íñades       ter
SFX K   er   ísemos       ver
SFX K   er   ísedes       ver
SFX K   er   íramos       ver
SFX K   er   írades       ver
SFX K   er   íamos        ver
SFX K   er   íamos        pracer
SFX K   er   íamos        facer
SFX K   er   íamos        dicer
SFX K   er   íades        ver
SFX K   er   íades        pracer
SFX K   er   íades        facer
SFX K   er   íades        dicer
SFX K   er   é            ver
SFX K   er   é            ter
SFX K   er   é            pracer
SFX K   er   é            facer
SFX K   er   é            dicer
SFX K   er   iñas         ter
SFX K   er   iñan         ter
SFX K   er   iña          ter
SFX K   er   ivésemos     ter
SFX K   er   ivésedes     ter
SFX K   er   ivéramos     ter
SFX K   er   ivérades     ter
SFX K   er   ivo          ter
SFX K   er   ivestes      ter
SFX K   er   iveses       ter
SFX K   er   ivesen       ter
SFX K   er   ivese        ter
SFX K   er   iveron       ter
SFX K   er   ivermos      ter
SFX K   er   iveres       ter
SFX K   er   iveren       ter
SFX K   er   iverdes      ter
SFX K   er   iveras       ter
SFX K   er   iveran       ter
SFX K   er   ivera        ter
SFX K   er   iver         ter
SFX K   er   iven         ter
SFX K   er   ivemos       ter
SFX K   er   iveche       ter
SFX K   er   iu           ver
SFX K   er   istos        ver
SFX K   er   isto         ver
SFX K   er   istes        ver
SFX K   er   istas        ver
SFX K   er   ista         ver
SFX K   er   ises         ver
SFX K   er   isen         ver
SFX K   er   ise          ver
SFX K   er   iron         ver
SFX K   er   irmos        ver
SFX K   er   ires         ver
SFX K   er   iren         ver
SFX K   er   irdes        ver
SFX K   er   iras         ver
SFX K   er   iran         ver
SFX K   er   ira          ver
SFX K   er   ir           ver
SFX K   er   in           ver
SFX K   er   imos         ver
SFX K   er   idos         ter
SFX K   er   idos         pracer
SFX K   er   ido          ter
SFX K   er   ido          pracer
SFX K   er   idas         ter
SFX K   er   idas         pracer
SFX K   er   ida          ter
SFX K   er   ida          pracer
SFX K   er   iche         ver
SFX K   er   ias          ver
SFX K   er   ias          pracer
SFX K   er   ias          facer
SFX K   er   ias          dicer
SFX K   er   ian          ver
SFX K   er   ian          pracer
SFX K   er   ian          facer
SFX K   er   ian          dicer
SFX K   er   ia           ver
SFX K   er   ia           pracer
SFX K   er   ia           facer
SFX K   er   ia           dicer
SFX K   edir ido          gredir
SFX K   edir ides         gredir
SFX K   edir iden         gredir
SFX K   edir ide          gredir
SFX K   edir idas         gredir
SFX K   edir idan         gredir
SFX K   edir idamos       gredir
SFX K   edir idades       gredir
SFX K   edir ida          gredir
SFX K   cer  z            pracer
SFX K   cer  xésemos      dicer
SFX K   cer  xésedes      dicer
SFX K   cer  xéramos      dicer
SFX K   cer  xérades      dicer
SFX K   cer  xo           dicer
SFX K   cer  xestes       dicer
SFX K   cer  xeses        dicer
SFX K   cer  xesen        dicer
SFX K   cer  xese         dicer
SFX K   cer  xeron        dicer
SFX K   cer  xermos       dicer
SFX K   cer  xeres        dicer
SFX K   cer  xeren        dicer
SFX K   cer  xerdes       dicer
SFX K   cer  xeras        dicer
SFX K   cer  xeran        dicer
SFX K   cer  xera         dicer
SFX K   cer  xer          dicer
SFX K   cer  xen          dicer
SFX K   cer  xemos        dicer
SFX K   cer  xeche        dicer
SFX K   cer  tos          dicer
SFX K   cer  to           dicer
SFX K   cer  tas          dicer
SFX K   cer  ta           dicer
SFX K   cer  s            dicer
SFX K   cer  ríamos       facer
SFX K   cer  ríamos       dicer
SFX K   cer  ríades       facer
SFX K   cer  ríades       dicer
SFX K   cer  rás          facer
SFX K   cer  rás          dicer
SFX K   cer  rán          facer
SFX K   cer  rán          dicer
SFX K   cer  rá           facer
SFX K   cer  rá           dicer
SFX K   cer  rias         facer
SFX K   cer  rias         dicer
SFX K   cer  rian         facer
SFX K   cer  rian         dicer
SFX K   cer  ria          facer
SFX K   cer  ria          dicer
