Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.dic
abster/Kp
advir/pK
antedicer/Kp
antever/Kp
bendicer/Kp
compor/KRSpc
condicer/Kp
conter/XKnp
contravir/Kp
dicer/pKSR
entreter/Kp
expor/Kncp
malfacer/Kp
predispor/Kop
sorrir/KYp
transpor/oKp
agredir/pYKv
antepor/pnKo
compracer/XKSp
contrafacer/Kp
deter/pK
liquefacer/Kp
pospor/Kpn
predicer/pK
ter/RKp
transgredir/YKp
afacer/pKS
dispor/KIcp
entrever/Kp
manter/Kp
obter/Kp
pracer/XKSRp
prepor/Kpc
prever/Kp
propor/nKop
sobrepor/Kop
sobrevir/Kp
vir/Kp
xustapor/poK
ater/KXpn
contradicer/Kp
devir/Kp
facer/KRpS
interpor/Kpo
intervir/Kp
maldicer/Kp
opor/ncKp
perfacer/Kp
presupor/pKc
rarefacer/Kp
satisfacer/pKv
sotopor/Kp
supor/Kpc
ver/Knp
apor/pKS
avir/pKS
contrapor/Kcp
convir/KpSR
provir/Kp
superpor/Kopc
rever/K
